Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1719
Professional services; contract; agency official; conflict of interest; penalty.

Any agency official who offers to solicit or secure, or solicits or secures, a contract for professional services and to be paid, or is paid, any fee, commission, percentage, gift, or any other consideration contingent upon the award or making of such a contract for professional services between the agency and any company or firm shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 19.